District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

29A-221.12

Surplus assets — Distribution to stockholders.

Repealed.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1318, ch. 854, § 779
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(k)(3), 58 DCR 1720
2001 Ed., § 29-221.12.
1981 Ed., § 29-412.
1973 Ed., § 29-712.